Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
The required number of signatures  of Referendum Petition 2026-302 having
been verified by the  Secretary of State under ORS 250.105, the parts of chapter 1, Oregon
Laws 2025 (special session), that are referred by Referendum Petition  2026-302 to the people
under Article IV, section 1, of the Oregon Constitution, shall be submitted to  the people for
their approval or  rejection at a special election held throughout this state on the same date
as the primary election for 2026 set forth under ORS 254.056 (2).
SECTION 2. Except as otherwise provided in sections  1 to 6 of this 2026 Act, ORS chap-
ters 250, 251 and 254 apply to the special election held on  the measure described in section
1 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 3. ORS 250.085 applies to the ballot title prepared for the special election held
on the measure described in section 1 of this 2026 Act, except that, if  the Supreme Court
review process has  not been completed by March 12, 2026, the latest ballot title certified by
the Attorney  General shall be printed in the voters’ pamphlet and on the ballot, as provided
in ORS 250.067 (3).
SECTION 4. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 251.205, 251.215, 251.225, 251.230 and 251.235, the
explanatory statement to be  printed in the voters’ pamphlet for the measure described in
section 1 of this 2026  Act shall be prepared by a joint legislative committee created for this
purpose. The explanatory statement shall be filed with the Secretary of State not later  than
March 12, 2026.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 250.125, 250.127 and 250.131, the financial estimate to  be printed
in the voters’ pamphlet for the  measure described in section 1 of this 2026 Act shall be pre-
pared by a joint legislative committee created for this purpose. The financial estimate shall
be filed with the Secretary of State not later than March 12, 2026.
(3) The explanatory statement and the financial estimate prepared by the joint committee
shall be the explanatory statement and financial estimate printed in the voters’ pamphlet.
SECTION 5. (1) Arguments relating to the measure described in section 1 of this 2026
Act may be filed with the  Secretary of State under ORS 251.255, except that an argument
shall be filed not later than the date set by the Secretary of State by rule.
(2) Notwithstanding ORS 192.311 to  192.478 relating to public records, an argument filed
under this section is  exempt from public inspection until the fourth business day after the
deadline for filing arguments.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1599 (SB 1599-A) Page 1
SECTION 6. ORS 137.685 applies to the preparation of any racial  and ethnic impact
statement for the measure described  in section 1 of this 2026 Act, except that,
notwithstanding ORS 137.685:
(1) The processes for  preparing the statement may begin on the effective date of this 2026
Act; and
(2) The Secretary of State by rule shall establish a deadline  for filing the statement with
the secretary,  provide for a hearing on the statement and for the submission of suggested
changes to the statement, establish a deadline for filing any revised  statement and establish
the date by which the secretary shall certify any statement.
SECTION 7. This 2026 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2026 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate February 23, 2026
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 2, 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1599 (SB 1599-A) Page 2